Illinois, session 104th, SB2137.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by adding Section 110-4.5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-4.5 new)7    Sec. 110-4.5. Denial of pretrial release; firearm 8offenses. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 9the contrary, the denial of pretrial release is required if 10the person is a felon who is charged with a firearm offense.